Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3407
Policy; approval.

A policy meeting the requirements of section 44-3405 shall be approved, notwithstanding the provision of any other laws which specify the content of policies, if the policy provides protection not less favorable than that required by such laws.

Laws 1979, LB 415, § 7.